Utah statutes.
11-49-604.   Response to ethics complaint -- Filing -- Form.

(1)  The political subdivision officer or employee who is the subject of the complaint may file a response to the complaint no later than 30 days after the day on which the officer or employee receives delivery of an order issued by the commission under Subsection 11-49-602(7).

(2)  The respondent shall file the response with the commission and ensure that the response is in writing and contains the following information:

(a)  the name, address, and telephone number of the respondent;

(b)  for each alleged ethics violation in the complaint:

(i)  each affirmative defense asserted in response to the allegation, including a general description of each affirmative defense and the facts and circumstances supporting the defense to be provided by one or more affidavits, each of which shall comply with Subsection (4);

(ii)  the facts and circumstances refuting the allegation, which shall be provided by:

(A)  copies of official records or documentary evidence; or

(B)  one or more affidavits, each of which shall comply with Subsection (4);

(c)  a list of the witnesses that the respondent wishes to have called, including for each witness:

(i)  the name, address, and, if available, telephone number of the witness;

(ii)  a brief summary of the testimony to be provided by the witness; and

(iii)  a specific description of any documents or evidence the respondent desires the witness to produce;

(d)  a statement that the respondent:

(i)  has reviewed the allegations contained in the complaint and the sworn statements and documents attached to the response; and

(ii)  believes the contents of the response to be true and accurate; and

(e)  the signature of the respondent.

(3)  Promptly after receiving the response, the commission shall provide copies of the response to:

(a)  each member of the commission; and

(b)  the first named complainant on the complaint.

(4)  An affidavit described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) or (2)(b)(ii)(B) shall include the following information:

(a)  the name, address, and telephone number of the signer;

(b)  a statement that the signer has actual knowledge of the facts and circumstances alleged in the affidavit;

(c)  the facts and circumstances testified to by the signer;

(d)  a statement that the affidavit is believed to be true and correct and that false statements are subject to penalties of perjury; and

(e)  the signature of the signer.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

